Maryland, session 2026, HB1398.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
13–202.
(A) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, a transfer tax is imposed on an
instrument of writing:
(1) recorded with the clerk of the circuit court for a county; or
(2) filed with the Department and described in § 12–103(d) of this article.
(B) THE TRANSFER TAX IMPOSED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION
DOES NOT APPLY TO AN INSTRUMENT OF WRITING RECORDED OR FILED FROM JULY
1, 2026, TO JUNE 30, 2029, BOTH INCLUSIVE.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1398*

HOUSE BILL 1398
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.